Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-210
Estates in future; recognized.

Estates may be created to commence at a future day.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 57, p. 292;

R.S.1913, § 6194;

C.S.1922, § 5593;

C.S.1929, § 76-108;

R.S.1943, § 76-210.